Maryland, session 2026, SB0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
21–211.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(B) THE COUNTY BOARD AND THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL DEVELOP A CAREER AND
TECHNICAL EDUCATION PILOT PROGRAM IN THE COUNTY SCHOOLS THAT PREPARES
STUDENTS FOR A CAREER AS AN ELECTION OFFICIAL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0408*

SENATE BILL 408
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.